California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(g) The county clerk may retain a cash deposit until the expiration of three years from the date the registrant has ceased to do business, or three years from the expiration or revocation date of the registration, in order to ensure there are no outstanding claims against the deposit. A judge may order the return of the deposit prior to the expiration of three years upon evidence satisfactory to the judge that there are no outstanding claims against the deposit.

(h) The bond required by this section shall be in favor of the State of California for the benefit of any person who is damaged as a result of the violation of this chapter or by the fraud, dishonesty, or incompetency of an individual, partnership, or corporation registered under this chapter. The bond required by this section shall also indicate the name of the
 county in which it will be filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 295, Sec. 7.   (AB 285)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6406.

(a) If granted, a certificate of registration shall be effective for a period of two years, until the date the bond expires, or until the total number of legal document assistants and unlawful detainer assistants employed by a partnership or corporation exceeds the number allowed for the amount of the bond in effect, whichever occurs first. Thereafter, a registrant shall file a new certificate of registration or a renewal of the certificate of registration and pay the fee required by Section 6404, and increase the amount of the bond if required to comply with subdivision (a) of Section 6405. A certificate of registration that is currently effective may be renewed up to 60 days prior to its expiration date and the effective date of the renewal shall be the date the current registration expires. The renewal shall be effective
 for a period of two years from the effective date or until the expiration date of the bond, or until the total number of legal document assistants and unlawful detainer assistants employed by a partnership or corporation exceeds the number allowed for the dollar amount of the bond in effect, whichever occurs first.

(b) Except as provided in subdivisions (d) to (f), inclusive, an applicant shall be denied registration or renewal of registration if the applicant has been any of the following:

(1) Convicted of a felony, or of a misdemeanor under Section 6126 or 6127, or found liable under Section 6126.5.

(2) Held liable in a civil action by final judgment or entry of a stipulated judgment, if the action alleged fraud, or the use of an untrue or misleading representation, or the use of an unfair, unlawful, or deceptive
 business practice.

(3) Convicted of a misdemeanor violation of this chapter.

(4) Had a civil judgment entered against them in an action arising out of the applicant’s negligent, reckless, or willful failure to properly perform their obligation as a legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant.

(5) Had
 their registration revoked pursuant to Section 6413.

(c) If the county clerk finds that the applicant has failed to demonstrate having met the requisite requirements of Section 6402, 6402.1, or 6402.2, or that any of the paragraphs of subdivision (b) apply, the county clerk, within three business days of submission of the application and fee, shall return the application and fee to the applicant with a notice to the applicant indicating the reason for the denial and the method of appeal.

(d) The denial of an application may be appealed by the applicant by submitting, to the director, the following:

(1) The completed application and notice from the county clerk specifying the reasons for the denial of the application.

(2) A copy of any final judgment or order that resulted from any conviction or civil judgment listed on the application.

(3) Any relevant information the applicant wishes to include for the record.

(e) The director shall order the applicant’s certificate of registration to be granted if the director determines that the issuance of a certificate of registration is not likely to expose consumers to a significant risk of harm based on a review of the application and any other information relating to the applicant’s unlawful act or unfair practice described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b). The director shall order the applicant’s certificate of registration to be denied if the director determines that issuance of a certificate of registration is likely to expose consumers to a significant risk of harm based on a review of the application and any
 other information relating to the applicant’s unlawful act or unfair practice described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b). The director shall send to the applicant and the county clerk a written decision listing the reasons registration shall be granted or denied within 30 days of the submission of the matter.

(f) If the director orders that the certificate of registration be granted, the applicant may resubmit the application, with the appropriate application fee and the written decision of the director. The county clerk shall grant the certificate of registration to the applicant within three business days of being supplied this information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 128, Sec. 7.   (AB 1213)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6407.

(a) The county clerk shall maintain a register of legal document assistants, and a register of unlawful detainer assistants, assign a unique number to each legal document assistant, or unlawful detainer assistant, and issue an identification card to each one. Upon renewal of registration, the same number shall be assigned, provided that the applicant is renewing registration in the same county in which they were previously registered and there is no lapse of three or more years in the period of registration.

(b) The identification card shall be a card not less
 than three and one-quarter by two inches, and shall contain at the top, the title “Legal Document Assistant” or “Unlawful Detainer Assistant,” as appropriate, followed by the registrant’s name, address, registration number, date of expiration, and county of registration. It shall also contain a photograph of the registrant in the lower left corner. The identification card for a partnership or corporation registration shall be issued in the name of the partnership or corporation, and shall not contain a photograph. The front of the card, above the title, shall also contain the following statement in 12-point boldface type: “This person is not a lawyer.” The front of the card, at the bottom, shall also contain the following statement in 12-point boldface type: “The county clerk has not evaluated this person’s knowledge, experience, or services.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 128, Sec. 8.   (AB 1213)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Conduct of Business and Prohibited Acts [6408. - 6415.]

6408.

The registrant’s name, business address, telephone number, registration number, and county of registration shall appear in any solicitation or advertisement, and on any printed papers or documents prepared or used by the registrant, including, but not limited to, contracts, letterhead, business cards, correspondence, documents, forms, claims, petitions, checks, receipts, and pleadings. The registrant’s name, business address, telephone number, registration number, expiration date of the registration, and county of registration shall appear on the written contract required to be provided to a client pursuant to Section 6410, as well as on any Internet Web site maintained by the registrant, and in any solicitation, advertisement, document, or correspondence prepared or
 used by the registrant in electronic form.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 295, Sec. 10.   (AB 285)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6408.5.

(a) All advertisements or solicitations published, distributed, or broadcast offering legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant services shall include the following statement: “I am not an attorney. I can only provide self help services at your specific direction.” This subdivision does not apply to classified or “yellow pages” listings in a telephone or business directory of three lines or less that state only the name, address, and telephone number of the legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant.

(b) If the advertisement or solicitation is in a language other than English, the statement required by subdivision (a) shall be in the same language as the advertisement or solicitation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1018, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6409.

No legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant shall retain in their possession original documents of a client. A legal document assistant or an unlawful detainer assistant shall immediately return all of a client’s original documents to the client in any one or more of the following circumstances:

(a) If the client so requests at any time.

(b) If the written contract required by Section 6410 is not executed or is rescinded, canceled, or voided for any reason.

(c) If the services described pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 6410 have been completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 128, Sec. 9.   (AB 1213)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6409.1.

Notwithstanding any other law, the venue for an action arising out of a dispute between a legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant and their client shall be the county in which the client has their primary residence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 128, Sec. 10.   (AB 1213)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6410.

(a) Every legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant who enters into a contract or agreement with a client to provide services shall, prior to providing any services, provide the client with a written contract, the contents of which shall be prescribed by regulations adopted by the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(b) The written contract shall include all of the following provisions:

(1) The services to be performed.

(2) The costs of the services to be performed.

(3) The contact information of the county clerk’s office for the county in which the legal
 document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant is registered, including the address, phone number, and, if available,
 internet website.

(4) There shall be printed on the face of the contract in 12-point boldface type a statement that the legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant is not an attorney and may not perform the legal services that an attorney performs.

(5) The contract shall contain a statement in 12-point boldface type that the county clerk has not evaluated or approved the registrant’s knowledge or experience, or the quality of the registrant’s services.

(6) The contract shall contain a statement in 12-point boldface type that the consumer may obtain information regarding free or low-cost representation through a local bar association or legal aid foundation and that the consumer may contact local law enforcement, a district attorney, or a legal aid foundation if
 the consumer believes that
 they have been a victim of fraud, the unauthorized practice of law, or any other injury.

(7) The contract shall contain a statement in 12-point boldface type that a legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant is not permitted to engage in the practice of law, including providing any kind of advice, explanation, opinion, or recommendation to a consumer about possible legal rights, remedies, defenses, options, selection of forms, or strategies.

(c) The contract shall be written both in English and in any other language comprehended by the client and principally used in any oral sales presentation or negotiation leading to execution of the contract. The legal document assistant or the unlawful detainer assistant is responsible for translating the contract into the language principally used in any oral sales presentation or
 negotiation leading to the execution of the contract.

(d) A written contract entered into on or after January 1, 2016, shall contain a statement that, pursuant to Section 6409.1, the venue for an action arising out of a dispute between a legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant and their client shall be the county in which the client has their primary residence.

(e) Failure of a legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant to comply with subdivisions (a),
 (b), (c), and (d) shall make the contract or agreement for services voidable at the option of the client. Upon the voiding of the contract, the legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant shall immediately return in full any fees paid by the client.

(f) In addition to any other right to rescind, the client shall have the right to rescind the contract within 24 hours of the signing of the contract. The client may cancel the contract by giving the legal document assistant or the unlawful detainer assistant any written statement to the effect that the contract is canceled. If the client gives notice of cancellation by mail addressed to the legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant, with first-class postage prepaid, cancellation is effective upon the date indicated on the postmark. Upon the voiding or rescinding of the contract or agreement for services, the legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant shall
 immediately return to the client any fees paid by the client, except fees for services that were actually, necessarily, and reasonably performed on the client’s behalf by the legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant with the client’s knowing and express written consent. The requirements of this subdivision shall be conspicuously set forth in the written contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 128, Sec. 11.   (AB 1213)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6410.5.

(a) It is unlawful for any legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant, in the first contact with a prospective client of legal document or unlawful detainer assistant services, to enter into a contract or agreement for services or accept any compensation unless the legal document assistant or the unlawful detainer assistant states orally, clearly, affirmatively, and expressly all of the following, before making any other statement, except statements required by law in telephonic or home solicitations, and a greeting, or asking the prospective client any questions:

(1) The identity of the person making the solicitation.

(2) The trade name of the person represented by the person making
 the solicitation, if any.

(3) The kind of services being offered for sale.

(4) The statement: “I am not an attorney” and, if the person offering legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant services is a partnership or a corporation, or uses a fictitious business name, “[name] is not a law firm. I/we cannot represent you in court, advise you about your legal rights or the law, or select legal forms for you.”

(5) The county in which the legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant is registered and their registration number.

(6) The
 expiration date of the legal document assistant’s or unlawful detainer assistant’s current registration period.

(b) After the legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant makes the oral statements required pursuant to subdivision (a), and before the legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant enters into a contract or agreement for services or accepts any compensation, the legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant shall provide the prospective client with a “Notice to Consumer” set forth below. After allowing the prospective client time to read the notice, the legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant shall ask the prospective client to sign and date the notice. If the first contact is not in person, the legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant shall provide the notice to the prospective client at the first in-person meeting or mail the notice to the prospective client before
 entering into a contract or agreement for services or accepting any compensation. The notice shall be set forth in black, bold, 12-point type on a separate, white, 812 by 11 inch sheet of paper that contains no other print or graphics, and shall be in the form set forth below. The notice shall contain only the appropriate name or other designation from those indicated in brackets below. At the time a prospective client signs the notice and before that prospective client is offered any contract or agreement for signature, the legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant shall give the prospective client a clearly legible copy of the signed notice. A legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant shall not ask or require a prospective client or a client to sign any other form of acknowledgment regarding this notice.NOTICE TO CONSUMERDO NOT SIGN ANYTHING BEFORE YOU READ THIS PAGEIn the first conversation when you contacted [the unlawful detainer assistant or the legal document assistant], did they explain . . . . . . . . .[Name of unlawful detainer assistant or legal document assistant] is not an
 attorney.[Name of corporation or partnership, if any, that is offering legal document assistant services or unlawful detainer assistant services] is not a law firm.[They/name of the business] cannot represent you in court.[They/name of the business] cannot advise you about your legal
 rights or the law.[They/name of the business] cannot select legal forms for you.[They/name of the business] is registered in [county name] and the registration number is [registration number].[They/name
 of the business]’s registration is valid until [date of expiration of registration], after which it must be renewed.To confirm that [they/name of business] is registered, you may contact the [county name] clerk’s office at [office address], [or] [office phone number], [or] [if available, office
 internet website].Choose one:Yes, they explained.No, they did not explain.Date:Signature:(c) The legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant shall be responsible for translating, if necessary, the “Notice to Consumer” required pursuant to subdivision (b) into the language principally used in any oral sales presentation or negotiation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 128, Sec. 12.   (AB 1213)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6411.

It is unlawful for any person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of a legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant to do any of the following:

(a) Make false or misleading statements to the consumer concerning the subject matter, legal issues, or self-help service being provided by the legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant.

(b) Make any guarantee or promise to a client or prospective client, unless the guarantee or promise is in writing and the legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant has a reasonable factual basis for making the guarantee or promise.

(c) Make any statement that the legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant can or will obtain favors or has special influence with a court, or a state or federal agency.

(d) Provide assistance or advice which constitutes the unlawful practice of law pursuant to Section 6125, 6126, or 6127.

(e) Engage in the unauthorized practice of law, including, but not limited to, giving any kind of advice, explanation, opinion, or recommendation to a consumer about possible legal rights, remedies, defenses, options, selection of forms, or strategies. A legal document assistant shall complete documents only in the manner prescribed by subdivision (d) of Section 6400.

(f) Use in the person’s business name or advertising the words “legal aid,” “legal services,” or any similar term that has the capacity,
 tendency, or likelihood to mislead members of the public about that person’s status as a nonprofit corporation or governmentally supported organization offering legal services without charge to indigent people, or employing
 licensees of the State Bar to provide those services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 128, Sec. 13.   (AB 1213)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6412.

(a) Any owner or manager of residential or commercial rental property, tenant, or other person who is awarded damages in any action or proceeding for injuries caused by the acts of a registrant while in the performance of their duties as a legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant may recover damages from the bond or cash deposit required by Section 6405.

(b) If there has been a recovery against a bond or cash deposit under subdivision (a) and the registration has not been revoked pursuant to Section 6413, the
 registrant shall file a new bond or deposit an additional amount of cash within 30 days to reinstate the bond or cash deposit to the amount required by Section 6405. If the registrant does not file a bond, or deposit this amount within 30 days, the registrant’s certificate of registration shall be revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 128, Sec. 14.   (AB 1213)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6412.1.

(a) Any person injured by the unlawful act of a legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant shall retain all rights and remedies cognizable under law. The penalties, relief, and remedies provided in this chapter are not exclusive, and do not affect any other penalties, relief, and remedies provided by law.

(b) Any person injured by a violation of this chapter by a legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant may file a complaint and seek redress in any
 superior court for injunctive relief, restitution, and damages. Attorney’s fees shall be awarded to the prevailing plaintiff. A claim under this chapter may be maintained in small claims court, if the claim and relief sought are within the small claims court’s jurisdiction.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1018, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6412.5.

A legal document assistant or an unlawful detainer assistant may neither seek nor obtain a client’s waiver of any of the provisions of this chapter. Any waiver of the provisions of this chapter is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1018, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6413.

The county clerk shall revoke the registration of a legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant upon receipt of an official document or record stating that the registrant has been found guilty of the unauthorized practice of law pursuant to Section 6125, 6126, or 6127, has been found guilty of a misdemeanor violation of this chapter, has been found liable under Section 6126.5, or that a civil judgment has been entered against the registrant in an action arising out of the registrant’s negligent, reckless, or willful failure to properly perform their
 obligation as a legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant. The county clerk shall be given notice of the disposition in any court action by the city attorney, district attorney, or plaintiff, as applicable. A registrant whose registration is revoked pursuant to this section may reapply for registration three years after the revocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 128, Sec. 15.   (AB 1213)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6414.

A registrant whose certificate is revoked shall be entitled to challenge the decision in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1018, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------

6415.

A failure, by a person who engages in acts of a legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant, to comply with any of the requirements of Section 6401.6, 6402, 6408, or 6410, subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 6411, or Section 6412.5 is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), as to each client with respect to whom a violation occurs, or imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment. Payment of restitution to a client shall take
 precedence over payment of a fine.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1018, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 6401.7.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.6. Paralegals [6450. - 6456.]

6450.

(a) “Paralegal” means a person who holds himself or herself out to be a paralegal, who is qualified by education, training, or work experience, who either contracts with or is employed by an attorney, law firm, corporation, governmental agency, or other entity, and who performs substantial legal work under the direction and supervision of an active member of the State Bar of California, as defined in Section 6060, or an attorney practicing law in the federal courts of this state, that has been specifically delegated by the attorney to him or her. Tasks performed by a paralegal include, but are not limited to, case planning, development, and management; legal research; interviewing clients; fact gathering and retrieving information; drafting and analyzing legal documents; collecting, compiling, and utilizing technical information to make an independent decision and recommendation to the supervising attorney; and representing clients before a state or federal administrative agency if that representation is permitted by statute, court rule, or administrative rule or regulation.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a paralegal shall not do the following:

(1) Provide legal advice.

(2) Represent a client in court.

(3) Select, explain, draft, or recommend the use of any legal document to or for any person other than the attorney who directs and supervises the paralegal.

(4) Act as a runner or capper, as defined in Sections 6151 and 6152.

(5) Engage in conduct that constitutes the unlawful practice of law.

(6) Contract with, or be employed by, a natural person other than an attorney to perform paralegal services.

(7) In connection with providing paralegal services, induce a person to make an investment, purchase a financial product or service, or enter a transaction from which income or profit, or both, purportedly may be derived.

(8) Establish the fees to charge a client for the services the paralegal performs, which shall be established by the attorney who supervises the paralegal’s work. This paragraph does not apply to fees charged by a paralegal in a contract to provide paralegal services to an attorney, law firm, corporation, governmental agency, or other entity as provided in subdivision (a).

(c) A paralegal shall possess at least one of the following:

(1) A certificate of completion of a paralegal program approved by the American Bar Association.

(2) A certificate of completion of a paralegal program at, or a degree from, a postsecondary institution that requires the successful completion of a minimum of 24 semester, or equivalent, units in law-related courses and that has been accredited by a national or regional accrediting organization or approved by the Bureau for Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education.

(3) A baccalaureate degree or an advanced degree in any subject, a minimum of one year of law-related experience under the supervision of an attorney who has been an active member of the State Bar of California for at least the preceding three years or who has practiced in the federal courts of this state for at least the preceding three years, and a written declaration from this attorney stating that the person is qualified to perform paralegal tasks.

(4) A high school diploma or general equivalency diploma, a minimum of three years of law-related experience under the supervision of an attorney who has been an active member of the State Bar of California for at least the preceding three years or who has practiced in the federal courts of this state for at least the preceding three years, and a written declaration from this attorney stating that the person is qualified to perform paralegal tasks. This experience and training shall be completed no later than December 31, 2003.

(d) Every two years, commencing January 1, 2007, any person that is working as a paralegal shall be required to certify completion of four hours of mandatory continuing legal education in legal ethics and four hours of mandatory continuing legal education in either general law or in an area of specialized law. All continuing legal education courses shall meet the requirements of Section 6070. Certification of these continuing education requirements shall be made with the paralegal’s supervising attorney. The paralegal shall be responsible for keeping a record of the paralegal’s certifications.

(e) A paralegal does not include a nonlawyer who provides legal services directly to members of the public, or a legal document assistant or unlawful detainer assistant as defined in Section 6400, unless the person is a person described in subdivision (a).

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2004.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6451.

It is unlawful for a paralegal to perform any services for a consumer except as performed under the direction and supervision of the attorney, law firm, corporation, government agency, or other entity that employs or contracts with the paralegal. Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a paralegal who is employed by an attorney, law firm, governmental agency, or other entity from providing services to a consumer served by one of these entities if those services are specifically allowed by statute, case law, court rule, or federal or state administrative rule or regulation. “Consumer” means a natural person, firm, association, organization, partnership, business trust, corporation, or public entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 311, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

6452.

(a) It is unlawful for a person to identify himself or herself as a paralegal on any advertisement, letterhead, business card or sign, or elsewhere unless he or she has met the qualifications of subdivision (c) of Section 6450 and performs all services under the direction and supervision of an attorney who is an active member of the State Bar of California or an attorney practicing law in the federal courts of this state who is responsible for all of the services performed by the paralegal. The business card of a paralegal shall include the name of the law firm where he or she is employed or a statement that he or she is employed by or contracting with a licensed attorney.

(b) An attorney who uses the services of a paralegal is liable for any harm caused as the result of the paralegal’s negligence, misconduct, or violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6453.

A paralegal is subject to the same duty as an attorney specified in subdivision (e) of Section 6068 to maintain inviolate the confidentiality, and at every peril to himself or herself to preserve the attorney-client privilege, of a consumer for whom the paralegal has provided any of the services described in subdivision (a) of Section 6450.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6454.

The terms “paralegal,” “legal assistant,” “attorney assistant,” “freelance paralegal,” “independent paralegal,” and “contract paralegal” are synonymous for purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6455.

(a) Any consumer injured by a violation of this chapter may file a complaint and seek redress in superior court for injunctive relief, restitution, and damages. Attorney’s fees shall be awarded in this action to the prevailing plaintiff.

(b) Any person who violates the provisions of Section 6451 or 6452 is guilty of an infraction for the first violation, which is punishable upon conviction by a fine of up to two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) as to each consumer with respect to whom a violation occurs, and is guilty of a misdemeanor for the second and each subsequent violation, which is punishable upon conviction by a fine of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) as to each consumer with respect to whom a violation occurs, or imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment. Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be ordered by the court to pay restitution to the victim pursuant to Section 1202.4 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 43, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

6456.

An individual employed by the state as a paralegal, legal assistant, legal analyst, or similar title, is exempt from the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Professional Fiduciaries [6500. - 6592.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [6500. - 6502.]

6500.

This chapter shall be known as the Professional Fiduciaries Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 491, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6501.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Act” means this chapter.

(b) “Bureau” means the Professional Fiduciaries Bureau within the Department of Consumer Affairs, established pursuant to Section 6510.

(c) “Client” means an individual who is served by a professional fiduciary.

(d) “Department” means the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(e) “Licensee” means a person who is licensed under this chapter as a professional
 fiduciary.

(f) (1) “Professional fiduciary” means either of the following:

(A) A person who acts as a guardian or conservator of the person, the estate, or the person and estate, for two or more individuals at the same time who are not related to the professional fiduciary or to each other.

(B) A personal representative of a decedent’s estate, as defined in Section 58 of the Probate Code, for two or more individuals at the same time who are not related to the professional fiduciary or to each other.

(2) “Professional fiduciary” also means a person who acts as a trustee, agent under a durable power of attorney for health care, or agent
 under a durable power of attorney for finances, for four or more individuals, at the same time.

In counting individuals under this paragraph to determine whether a person is a professional fiduciary:

(A) Individuals who are related to the fiduciary shall not be counted.

(B) All individuals who are related to each other shall be counted as one individual.

(C) All trustors who are related to each other shall be counted as one individual, and neither the number of trusts nor the number of beneficiaries of those trusts shall be counted.

(D) “Professional fiduciary” also includes a person acting as a professional
 fiduciary practice administrator, appointed pursuant to Section 2469 or 9765 of the Probate Code.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “related” means related by blood, adoption, marriage, or registered domestic partnership.

(4) “Professional fiduciary” does not include any of the following:

(A) A trust company, as defined in Section 83 of the Probate Code.

(B) An FDIC-insured institution, or its holding companies, subsidiaries, or affiliates. For the purposes of this subparagraph, “affiliate” means an entity that shares an ownership interest with, or that is under the common control of, the FDIC-insured institution.

(C) A public agency, including the public guardian, public conservator, or other agency of the State of California or of a county of California or a regional center for persons with developmental disabilities, as defined in Section 4620 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(D) A nonprofit corporation or charitable trust that is described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that satisfies all of the following requirements:

(i) Is an organization described in Section 509(a)(1), Section 509(a)(2), or Section 509(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(ii) Has been in existence for at least five years.

(iii) Has total institutional funds as described in subdivision (e) of Section 18502 of the Probate Code according to its most recent audited financial statement with a value of at least two million dollars ($2,000,000) net of encumbrances.

(iv) Is acting as a trustee, incidental to the purposes for which it was organized, of a trust that meets at least one of the following conditions:

(I) It is a trust from which annual distributions are limited to income, a sum certain, or a fixed percentage of the net fair market value of the trust assets as described in Section 664(d) of the Internal Revenue Code governing charitable remainder trusts.

(II) It is a trust from which annual distributions are limited to a
 guaranteed annuity or a fixed percentage of the fair market value of the property as described in Section 2055(e)(2)(B) or Section 2522(c)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(III) It is a trust from which annual distributions are limited to income, including a pooled income fund from which annual distributions are limited to income as described in Section 642(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code governing pooled income funds.

(IV) It is a trust as to which the value of the charitable interest was presently ascertainable upon creation of the trust and deductible for federal gift, estate, or income tax purposes under the Internal Revenue Code as in effect prior to enactment of the federal Tax Reform Act of 1969 (Public Law 91-172).
